District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Support, Opportunity, Unity, Legal Relationships (SOUL) Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 23 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Code is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new subchapter designation to read as
follows:
“Subchapter VII. Support, Opportunity, Unity, Legal Relationships.
“16-2399.21. Definitions.
“16-2399.22. Selecting SOUL as a permanency plan.
“16-2399.23. Motion to establish a SOUL Family.
“16-2399.24. Allocation of rights and responsibilities.
“16-2399.25. SOUL Family agreement.
“16-2399.26. Parties to a SOUL Family proceeding.
“16-2399.27. Notice.
“16-2399.28. Conduct of hearings.
“16-2399.29. Adjudicatory hearings.
“16-2399.30. Effect of a SOUL Family order.
“16-2399.31. Jurisdiction.
“16-2399.32. SOUL Family order – finality, appeals, transcripts.
“16-2399.33. Confidentiality of records.
“16-2399.34. Unlawful disclosure.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“16-2399.35. Modification of a SOUL Family order.
“16-2399.36. Subsidy.
“16-2399.37. Rules.”.
(b) Section 16-2323(c) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; or”
in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (5) is added to read as follows:
“(5) Placed with a SOUL Family, as that term is defined in § 16-2399.21.”.
(c) A new subchapter VII is added to read as follows:
“Subchapter VII. Support, Opportunity, Unity, Legal Relationships.
“§ 16-2399.21. Definitions.
“For purposes of this subchapter, the term:
“(1) “Agency” means the Child and Family Services Agency, established by § 4-
1303.01a, including the Child and Family Services Agency’s contracted placement and service
providers.
“(2) “Parent and child relationship” shall have the same meaning as defined in §
16-2352(a)(1).
“(3) “SOUL” means a permanency plan for a youth in the care and custody of the
Agency that allows the youth to establish a legal relationship with a SOUL Family, without
terminating existing familial legal relationships, including the parent and child relationship and
sibling relationships.
“(4) “SOUL Caregiver” means an adult who is not the youth’s birth parent and
who is committed to providing housing for the youth, meeting the basic needs of the youth, and
holding rights and taking on responsibilities to care for the youth as specified in the SOUL
Family agreement.
“(5) “SOUL Family” means a legal relationship between a youth, a SOUL
Caregiver, and at least one other SOUL Caregiver or SOUL Supporter.
“(6) “SOUL Family Form” means a form for selecting a SOUL permanency plan,
as specified by the Family Court.
“(7) “SOUL Supporter” means an adult who is committed to holding rights and
responsibilities to care for the youth as specified in the SOUL Family agreement.
“(8) “Youth” means an individual who:
“(A) Is 16 years of age or older, but less than 21 years of age;
“(B) Has been adjudicated to be neglected pursuant to § 16-2317; and
“(C) Is in the care and custody of the Agency.
“§ 16-2399.22. Selecting SOUL as a permanency plan.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a) Unless the Family Court determines that changing the permanency plan is not in the
best interests of the youth, the Family Court, after giving all parties to the neglect case the
opportunity to be heard, shall change the permanency plan to SOUL if the youth requests that the
Family Court change their permanency plan to SOUL by:
“(1) Appearing in court and making the request on the record;
“(2) Submitting a SOUL Family Form signed by the youth and their guardian ad
litem or stated interest attorney;
“(3) Executing an affidavit signed by both the youth and legal counsel stating the
request; or
“(4) Filing a motion to change the permanency plan.
“(b) If the Family Court determines that changing the permanency plan to SOUL is not in
the best interests of the child, the Family Court shall state its basis in writing.
“§ 16-2399.23. Motion to establish a SOUL Family.
“(a) Only a youth may initiate a proceeding to establish a SOUL Family by the filing of a
motion to establish a SOUL Family, with the assistance of a guardian ad litem or stated interest
attorney as needed.
“(b) If the guardian ad litem does not support the SOUL Family agreement as being in the
best interest of the youth, the Family Court shall appoint a stated interest attorney to assist the
youth with the proceeding to establish a SOUL Family. The guardian ad litem shall continue to
represent the best interest of the youth.
“(c) A motion to establish a SOUL Family shall include:
“(1) A description of the proposed SOUL Family, identifying each member of the
SOUL Family by name and role;
“(2) A statement explaining why the establishment of the proposed SOUL Family
is in the youth’s best interest;
“(3) Written parental consents, if any, to the proposed SOUL Family; and
“(4) A proposed SOUL Family agreement that meets the requirements of this
subchapter.
“(d) A youth may file a motion to establish a SOUL Family even if a parent, the District
government, or the guardian ad litem objects or fails to sign the SOUL Family agreement. The
motion shall identify any such person or entity who objects or fails to sign the SOUL Family
agreement.
“(e) Any person or entity who objects or fails to sign the SOUL Family agreement may
file a praecipe or opposition alerting the court to the points of disagreement, the reasoning, and
the efforts to resolve the disagreement.
“§ 16.2399.24. Allocation of rights and responsibilities.
“(a) Unless the Family Court specifies otherwise, one or more SOUL Caregivers shall
maintain physical custody of the youth until they are 18 years of age.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b) The SOUL Family shall determine the allocation of the following legal custody
rights between SOUL Caregivers and SOUL Supporters until the youth is 18 years of age:
“(1) Access to information related to the youth’s education;
“(2) The right to make educational decisions when a decision by a parent is
required by law, regulation, or policy;
“(3) Access to information related to the youth’s physical or mental health;
“(4) Consent to health care when consent of a parent is required by law,
regulation, or policy;
“(5) Authorize release of information when consent of a parent is required by law,
regulation, or policy;
“(6) Make financial decisions when a decision by a parent is required by law,
regulation, or policy;
“(7) Consent to social and school activities of the child; and
“(8) Consent to military enlistment.
“(c) Rights not specified in subsection (b) of this section that are not allocated to a
member of the SOUL Family shall remain with the youth’s birth parents or any other such
person who held the rights at the time the youth entered into the SOUL Family agreement, until
the youth is 18 years of age.
“(d) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the youth shall retain all existing
legal rights or capacity to make education, medical, or financial decisions for themselves under
District law.
“(e) The SOUL Family shall determine the allocation of the following responsibilities
concerning the youth amongst the SOUL Family:
“(1) Housing;
“(2) Food, clothing, transportation, and meeting any other of the youth’s basic
needs;
“(3) Support for the youth’s education;
“(4) Support for the youth’s physical and mental health and well-being;
“(5) Guidance and consistent support through challenges; and
“(6) Support for the youth’s development of financial management, problem-
solving, and independent living skills.
“(f) If a SOUL Family has more than one SOUL Caregiver, a lead SOUL Caregiver shall
be designated. If there is a disagreement concerning the youth’s rights and responsibilities or any
other aspect related to the youth’s care , the lead SOUL Caregiver shall make the final decision if
the youth is less than 18 years of age.
“§16-2399.25. SOUL Family agreement.
“(a) The process for developing the SOUL Family agreement shall be youth-driven, with
support, guidance, and structure from the Agency.
“(b) The SOUL Family agreement shall include:
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) The allocation of rights and responsibilities among the SOUL Family as
described in §16-2399.24;
“(2) Designation of a lead SOUL Caregiver, if there is more than one SOUL
Caregiver;
“(3) A statement that the SOUL Caregiver, or lead SOUL Caregiver if there is
more than one SOUL Caregiver, shall make the final decision if members of the SOUL Family
are in disagreement concerning the rights and responsibilities listed in § 16-2399.24, or any other
aspect related to the care of the youth under the age of 18;
“(4) A summary of the financial responsibilities and expectations of the youth and
the SOUL Family members, including how the subsidy funds, may be distributed;
“(5) A description of any resources or ongoing supports the Agency agrees to
provide to support the SOUL Family;
“(6) Information regarding Agency, District, state, federal or other public benefit
programs that the youth may:
“(A) Be eligible for if they remained committed to the legal custody of the
Agency; and
“(B) Retain eligibility for after closure of the neglect case;
“(7) Details regarding how establishing the SOUL Family, the closure of the
youth’s neglect case, and the payment of the subsidy may impact the eligibility of the youth and
their SOUL Family members for other public benefits; and
“(8) Any other agreements or terms identified by the youth or SOUL Family
members as being important to having shared expectations, including additional rights and
responsibilities of how the SOUL Family shall work.
“(c) The SOUL Family agreement shall be signed by:
“(1) The youth;
“(2) All SOUL Family members acknowledging their agreement to the SOUL
Family agreement, including the allocation of rights and responsibilities with respect to the
youth;
“(3) The guardian ad litem acknowledging that he or she has provided legal
advice and counseling to the youth and that the proposed SOUL Family agreement serves the
youth’s best interest, or the stated interest attorney acknowledging that he or she has provided
legal advice and counseling to the youth; and
“(4) The Agency, acknowledging its agreement to the subsidy provisions and to
any additional commitments named.
“(d) At any time between the filing of this motion and the issuance of a final order
establishing the SOUL family, the Family Court or any party to the SOUL Family agreement
may request an amendment to the proposed SOUL Family agreement.
“§ 16-2399.26. Parties to a SOUL Family proceeding.
“(a) The parties to a proceeding to establish a SOUL shall include:
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) The youth;
“(2) The youth’s parent; provided, that they retain legal rights;
“(3) All proposed SOUL Caregivers; and
“(4) The agency having legal custody of the child and the District of Columbia.
“(b) A proposed SOUL Supporter shall be provided notice of, and an opportunity to be
heard, in a proceeding to establish a SOUL Family.
“(c) The guardian ad litem shall continue to represent the best interests of the youth and
have the rights of a party during these proceedings.
“(d) The Agency may, upon request, provide support for a SOUL Caregiver to access
legal representation.
“(e) The Family Court may, at its discretion, join other parties on its own motion or in
response to a motion for joinder or intervention.
“§ 16-2399.27. Notice.
“(a) When a motion to establish a SOUL Family is filed, the Family Court shall promptly
set a time for an adjudicatory hearing and shall cause notice thereof to be given to all parties.
“(b) The Family Court shall direct the issuance to, and personal service upon, the youth’s
parents of a summons and a copy of the motion to establish a SOUL Family.
“(c) When it is appropriate to the proper disposition of the case, the Family Court may
direct the service of a summons upon other persons.
“(d) If personal service under this section cannot be effected, notice shall be made
constructively pursuant to rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.
“§ 16-2399.28. Conduct of hearings.
“(a) All hearings and proceedings conducted pursuant to this subchapter shall be held by
a judge, without a jury.
“(b) All hearings and proceedings conducted pursuant to this subchapter shall be recorded
by appropriate means.
“(c) Except in hearings to declare a person in contempt of Family Court, the public shall
be excluded from hearings and proceedings arising pursuant to this subchapter. Only persons
necessary to such hearings and proceedings shall be admitted; except, that the Family Court may,
pursuant to the rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, admit such other persons
as having a proper interest in the case or the work of the Family Court on the condition that they
refrain from divulging information identifying the child involved in the proceedings or members
of their family.
“(d) To enable participation by the youth and all members of the proposed SOUL Family,
the Family Court and the Agency shall work closely with the parties to schedule any hearings or
proceedings.
“§ 16-2399.29. Adjudicatory hearings.
“(a) An adjudicatory hearing on the motion to establish a SOUL Family shall be
scheduled to occur within 90 days after the filing of the motion.
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b)(1) The Family Court shall begin the adjudicatory hearing by determining whether all
parties are present and whether proper notice of the hearing has been given.
“(2) If a parent has been given proper notice but fails to appear, the Family Court
may proceed in the parent’s absence.
“(3) The Family Court may not proceed without the youth or any of the members
of the proposed SOUL Family.
“(c) Each party shall have the right to present evidence, to be heard on his or her own
behalf, and to cross-examine witnesses called by another party. The Family Court may direct the
Agency to submit a summary report or provide testimony establishing that the Agency
completed background and safety checks and addressed any safety-related concerns.
“(d) The moving party, the youth, shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of
the evidence that the proposed SOUL Family is in the youth’s best interest.
“(e) In considering whether to grant the motion to establish the proposed SOUL Family,
the Family Court shall consider all relevant, material, and competent evidence presented at the
adjudicatory hearing. Neither the spouse or domestic partner privilege nor the physician-client or
mental health professional-client privilege shall be grounds for excluding evidence.
“(f) In its determination of whether to grant the motion to establish the proposed SOUL
Family, the Family Court shall consider whether the proposed SOUL Family is in the youth’s
best interest, based on the following factors:
“(1) The youth’s need for a stable and permanent home, adequate care that meets
their specific needs, and consistent and reliable caregivers;
“(2) The physical, mental, and emotional health of all individuals involved to the
degree that each affects the welfare of the youth, the decisive consideration being the physical,
mental, and emotional needs of the youth;
“(3) The quality of interaction and interrelationship of the youth with their
parents, siblings, relatives, caregivers, and the proposed SOUL Family members;
“(4) The terms of the proposed SOUL Family agreement, including whether:
“(A) The allocation of rights and responsibilities among the members of
the proposed SOUL Family is feasible and reasonable, considering the circumstances of the
youth and all members of the SOUL Family;
“(B) The fulfillment of the proposed SOUL Family agreement ensures the
youth has a stable home and their basic needs are met; and
“(C) The fulfillment of the proposed SOUL Family agreement promotes
the youth’s well-being and growth toward independent adulthood;
“(5) The youth’s opinion of their own best interests in the matter; and
“(6) The impact on the youth of remaining in the care and custody of the Agency.
“(g) The Family Court may modify the proposed SOUL Family agreement to more fully
support the best interests of the youth if all parties to the SOUL Family agreement consent to the
modifications.
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(h) At any time between the filing of this motion and the issuance of a final order
establishing the SOUL Family, the Family Court or any party to the SOUL Family agreement
may request amendments to the proposed SOUL Family agreement.
“(i) After considering all of the evidence presented, and after making a determination
based upon a preponderance of the evidence that the proposed SOUL Family is in the youth’s
best interest, the Family Court shall issue an order establishing the SOUL Family and closing the
neglect case, however the Family Court may not issue the order establishing the SOUL Family
until the following circumstances are met:
“(1) The youth has been living in the proposed SOUL Family arrangement for at
least 6 months; and
“(2) The youth requests closure of the neglect case.
“(j) If the Family Court determines, upon a party’s request or at its own discretion, that
additional time or evidence is necessary to determine whether the proposed SOUL Family is in
the youth’s best interest, the Family Court may continue the adjudicatory hearing.
“(k) A youth’s parent, or individual who previously held parental rights at the time the
youth entered the foster care system, may object to the transfer of any rights they hold under law
and have those objections duly considered by the Family Court and addressed in written
findings.
“§ 16-2399.30. Effect of a SOUL Family order.
“(a) A final order establishing a SOUL Family shall incorporate the entirety of the SOUL
Family agreement.
“(b) The entry of a SOUL Family order closes the neglect case.
“(c) The entry of a SOUL Family order does not terminate the parent and child
relationship, including:
“(1) The right of the child to inheritance;
“(2) The parents’ right to consent to the child’s adoption prior to the child
attaining the age of 18;
“(3) The parents’ right to determine the child’s religious affiliation prior to the
child attaining the age of 18;
“(4) The parents’ right to visit or contact the child (except as limited by the
Family Court) prior to the child attaining the age of 18; and
“(5) The parents’ responsibility to provide financial, medical, and other support
for the child.
“(d) The District government or the youth through the youth’s guardian ad litem or stated
interest attorney may move to terminate the parent and child relationship pursuant to § 16-
2354(a).
“§16-2399.31. Jurisdiction.
“(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the Family Court shall have jurisdiction to
enter a SOUL Family order and shall retain jurisdiction to modify a SOUL Family order until the
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
youth reaches 21 years of age; provided, that, when the youth reaches 18 years of age, the youth
consents and the Family Court finds it is in the best interest of the youth.
“(b) A youth who exits foster care to a SOUL Family may not reenter foster care after
age 18.
“§ 16-2399.32. SOUL Family order – finality, appeals, transcripts.
“(a) Every SOUL Family order shall be in writing and shall recite the findings upon
which such order is based, including findings pertaining to the Family Court’s jurisdiction.
“(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, the entry of a SOUL Family order
shall be final.
“(c) In all appeals from decisions of the Family Court with respect to a SOUL Family
order under this subchapter, the youth shall be identified only by initials in all transcripts, briefs,
and other papers filed, and all necessary steps, as prescribed by rules of the District of Columbia
Court of Appeals, shall be taken to protect the identity of the youth.
“(d) Upon the filing of a motion and supporting affidavit stating that they are financially
unable to purchase a transcript, a party who has filed notice of appeal or of interlocutory appeal
of an order under this subchapter shall be furnished, at no cost or at such part of cost as they are
able to pay, so much of the transcript as is necessary to prepare adequately and support the
appeal.
“(e) An appeal does not operate to stay the order, judgment, or decree appealed from, but
whenever the case is properly before the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, that Court, on
application and hearing, may order otherwise if suitable provision is made in the order for the
care and custody of the youth.
“§ 16-2399.33. Confidentiality of records.
“The provisions of §§ 16-2332 and 16-2333 shall apply to all records and files that are
created pursuant to proceedings under this subchapter.
“§ 16-2399.34. Unlawful disclosure.
“Whoever willfully discloses, receives, makes use of, or knowingly permits the use of
information concerning a youth or other person in violation of § 16-2399.33 shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined no more than the amount set forth in §
22-3571.01, or incarcerated for no more than 90 days, or both. A violation of this section shall be
prosecuted by the Office of the Attorney General of the District of Columbia.
“§ 16-2399.35. Modification of a SOUL Family order.
“(a) The youth may move the Family Court to modify a SOUL Family order to:
“(1) Add or remove members of the SOUL Family;
“(2) Revise the allocation of rights and responsibilities; or
“(3) Amend the terms of the SOUL Family agreement.
“(b) The youth’s parents may move the Family Court to modify a SOUL Family order if
the youth is under the age of 18 and there is a substantial and material change in the youth’s
circumstances.
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) Notice of a motion to modify a SOUL Family order shall be personally served on all
parties, including any proposed additional members of the SOUL Family. If personal service
under this section cannot be effected, notice shall be made constructively pursuant to the rules of
the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.
“(d) The Family Court may issue an order of reference directing the Mayor to file a report
and recommendation regarding the proposed modification of the SOUL Family order within 45
days after the filing date of the motion.
“(e) A SOUL Family order may be modified if the Family Court finds, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that it is in the youth’s best interests to modify the SOUL Family
order.
“(f) The Family Court shall hold an adjudicatory hearing before modifying a SOUL
Family order and shall, at the conclusion of the hearing, enter a written order reciting the
findings upon which such order is based, including findings pertaining to the Family Court’s
jurisdiction.
“§ 16-2399.36. Subsidy.
“(a) The Mayor may make subsidy payments to members of the SOUL Family,
irrespective of their state of residence, pursuant to this section.
“(b) Members of the SOUL Family who may be eligible for subsidy payments under this
section are limited to:
“(1) SOUL Caregivers who provide housing for the youth; and
“(2) The youth.
“(c) The Agency, the youth, and the SOUL Caregivers shall enter into a subsidy payment
agreement that shall be incorporated into the SOUL Family agreement.
“(d)(1) Subsidy payments shall be allocated as follows:
“(A) If the youth is 18 years and 6 months old or younger, the subsidy
shall be paid to the SOUL Caregiver or SOUL Caregivers who are providing housing; and
“(B) If the youth is older than 18 years and 6 months, half of the subsidy
shall be paid to the youth, and the remaining half shall be paid to the SOUL Caregivers who are
providing housing.
“(2) The SOUL Caregiver may choose to decline all or part of the subsidy, and
that portion shall be paid directly to the youth.
“(e) If the youth is 18 years of age or older and can establish that they are not residing
with a SOUL Caregiver, the youth may at any time request the Agency to pay the entire subsidy
to the youth and the Agency shall comply with this request.
“(f) Eligibility for subsidy payments under this section shall continue until the youth
reaches 21 years of age.
“(g) The Agency shall disseminate information to prospective members of the SOUL
Family as to eligibility for subsidy under this section.
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(h) SOUL Family subsidies shall be subject to the availability of appropriations.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an entitlement to a SOUL Family subsidy for
any person.
“§ 16-2399.37. Rules.
“Within 120 days after the effective date of this subchapter, the Mayor, pursuant to § 2-
501 et seq. shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.”.
Sec. 3. Section 502 of the Prevention of Child Abuse and Neglect Act of 1977, effective
June 27, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-136; D.C. Official Code § 4-1305.02), is amended by adding a new
paragraph (3A) to read as follows:
“(3A) An individual who seeks to be approved as a SOUL Caregiver, and, if
required by the Family Court, an individual who seeks to be approved as a SOUL Supporter, as
those terms are defined in D.C. Official Code § 16-2399.21.”.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
12